North Dakota, session 69, SB2358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 11-28.3-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
11-28.3-06. Organization - Board of directors.
1. At the time and place fixed by the county auditor for the public meeting as provided in section
11-28.3-05, the qualified electors present who reside within the boundaries of the district shall
proceed to organize the district. Permanent organization must be effected by the election of a
board of directors consisting of not less than five nor more than ten residents of the district.
The board of directors shall meet as soon after the organizational meeting as possible to elect
a president, a vice president, and a secretary-treasurer.
2. All directors and officers must be elected for two years and hold office until their successors
have been elected and qualified, except that at the first election the vice president must be
elected as provided in this section for a one-year term, and one-half, or as close to one-half as
possible depending upon the total number of directors, of the directors elected at the first
election after July 1, 1977, must be selected by lot in the presence of a majority of such
directors to serve one-year terms.
3. A district may specify in its bylaws a specified number of directors within the limitations in this
section, provided each township or group of townships receives equal representation on the
board with respect to the regions. The bylaws also may allow for a combination of regional
directors and at-large directors.
4. If a vacancy occurs in a board position due to a resignation, a special meeting must be called
and held within sixty days of the resignation for the purpose of electing a director to serve the
remainder of the term. All officers and directors shall serve without pay, except the secretary-
treasurer, who may be paid a salary determinedBoard members may receive compensation at
a rate set by the board of directors. No more than two elected members of the board may be
members of the licensed ambulance service serving the district territory and those board
members must meet the definition of volunteer in section 23-27-04.1.

S. B. NO. 2358 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2358.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
House Vote: Yeas 74 Nays 17 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State